Missouri, session 2026, HB3059.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.2040, to read as follows:
376.2040. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Advanced, metastatic cancer", cancer that has spread from the primary or
original site of the cancer to nearby tissues, lymph nodes, or other areas or parts of the
body;
(2) "Associated condition", any symptom or side effect that is associated with
advanced, metastatic cancer or its treatment and that, in the judgment of the health care
practitioner, further jeopardizes the health of a patient if left untreated;
(3) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350. The term "health benefit plan" shall also include MO HealthNet.
2. A health benefit plan that provides coverage for advanced, metastatic cancer
and associated conditions shall not require, before the health benefit plan provides
coverage of a prescription drug for advanced, metastatic cancer or an associated
condition, that the enrollee:
(1) Fail to successfully respond to a different drug; or
(2) Prove a history of failure of a different drug.
3. This section applies only to a drug the use of which is:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3059 2
(1) Consistent with best practices for the treatment of advanced, metastatic
cancer or an associated condition;
(2) Supported by peer-reviewed, evidence-based literature; and
(3) Approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
✔